Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.250

Decree of adoption—Determination of place and date of birth.

(1) A decree of adoption shall provide, as a minimum, the following information:

(a) The full original name of the person to be adopted;

(b) The full name of each petitioner for adoption;

(c) Whether the petitioner or petitioners are husband and wife, stepparent, or a single parent;

(d) The full new name of the person adopted, unless the name of the adoptee is not to be changed;

(e) Information to be incorporated in any new certificate of birth to be issued by the state or territorial registrar of vital records; and

(f) The adoptee's date of birth and place of birth as determined under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) Except for the names of the person adopted and the petitioner, information set forth in the decree that differs from that shown on the original birth certificate, alternative birth record, or other information used in lieu of such a record shall be included in the decree only upon a clear showing that the information in the original record is erroneous.

(3) In determining the date and place of birth of a person born outside the United States, the court shall:

(a) If available, enter in the decree the exact date and place of birth as stated in the birth certificate from the country of origin or in the United States department of state's report of birth abroad or in the documents of the United States immigration and naturalization service;

(b) If the exact place of birth is unknown, enter in the decree such information as may be known and designate a place of birth in the country of origin;

(c) If the exact date of birth is unknown, determine a date of birth based upon medical testimony as to the probable chronological age of the adoptee and other evidence regarding the adoptee's age that the court finds appropriate to consider;

(d) In any other case where documents of the United States immigration and naturalization service are not available, the court shall determine the date and place of birth based upon such evidence as the court in its discretion determines appropriate.

[ 1984 c 155 s 25.]